Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7913.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21-27.2-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-27.2 entitled "Single-
Use Plastic Straws" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-27.2-2. Prohibited practices exception.
A food service establishment shall not provide a single-use plastic straw to a consumer
unless requested or directly taken by the consumer.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005407
========